Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3058.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 40.1 of the General Laws entitled "BEHAVIORAL HEALTHCARE,
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES AND HOSPITALS" is hereby amended by adding thereto
the following chapter:
CHAPTER 30
988 CALL CENTER AND CRISIS OUTREACH AND STABILIZATION SERVICES
CENTER OPERATIONS ACT
40.1-30-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "988 call center" means the designated, non-governmental entity operating the federally
approved in-state contact center for the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline authorized under the
National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020, Pub. L. No. 116-172, 134 Stat. 832 (2020),
exclusively responsible for answering and responding to 988 contacts originating in Rhode Island.
(2) "988 contact" means a communication with the 988 Suicide & Crisis Lifeline system
within the United States operating through the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline or its successor
via modalities offered, including call, chat, or text.
(3) "Crisis outreach and stabilization services center" means a crisis outreach and
stabilization service center providing short term services with capacity for diagnosis, initial
management, observation, crisis stabilization, and follow up referral services to all persons in

response to 988 contacts, pursuant to chapter 23-17.26, and the National Suicide Hotline
Designation Act of 2020, Pub. L. No. 116-172, 134 Stat. 832 (2020).
(4) "Crisis receiving and stabilization centers" are facilities providing short term services
of up to twenty-four (24) hours with capacity for diagnosis, initial management, observation, crisis
stabilization and follow up referral services to all persons.
(5) "Lifeline administrator" means the entity that contracts with the Substance Abuse and
Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) to oversee the national 988 suicide and crisis
lifeline system and ensure it meets all federal requirements.
(6) “Operator” means the nonprofit entity designated to oversee the 988 call center pursuant
to § 40.1-30-3.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department of behavioral healthcare,
developmental disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH).
(8) "Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration ("SAMHSA")" means
the agency within the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services that leads public health
efforts to advance the behavioral health of the nation.
40.1-30-2. 988 and crisis outreach and stabilization services system established.
(a) The director is hereby authorized to designate and fully fund the 988 call center and
crisis receiving and stabilization centers to provide for diagnosis, initial management, observation,
crisis stabilization, and follow up referral services to all persons in response to 988 contacts.
(b) The director shall have the authority to allocate and expend any and all allocated funds
including state, federal, and private and public grant funds to support the 988 call center and crisis
outreach and stabilization services center system to:
(1) Operate, staff, and maintain the 988 call center;
(2) Acquire, upgrade, and maintain technology or telecommunications infrastructure for
988 call center use;
(3) Provide required training for call center staff in accordance with federal 988 program
standards;
(4) Provide acute mental health crisis outreach and stabilization services in direct response
to 988 and mental health crisis calls as authorized by the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act
of 2020, Pub. L. No. 116-172, 134 Stat. 832 (2020); and
(5) Conduct public awareness and first responder outreach efforts about the availability
and use of 988 and crisis outreach and stabilization services.
(c) Funding for the 988 call center and crisis outreach and stabilization services shall not
be used to:
LC005059/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(1) Expand into service areas beyond those allowed by the National Suicide Hotline
Designation Act or implementing SAMHSA guidance; or
(2) Fund operations, staff, or administration of any state agency.
40.1-30-3. Governance and independence of 988 call center operations.
(a) The 988 call center shall be operated by a nonprofit entity appointed by the director and
approved by the lifeline administrator designated by SAMHSA in accordance with federal grant
requirements. In the event the nonprofit entity ceases operation, and another nonprofit entity cannot
operate the call center within a reasonable time, BHDDH is authorized to operate the 988 call center
until a qualified nonprofit entity is appointed by the director and approved by SAMHSA.
(b) The call center shall operate collaboratively with all Rhode Island executive
departments and shall be subject to the oversight and direction of BHDDH.
(c) BHDDH shall establish an advisory board to promote compliance with national
standards and best practices. The advisory board shall consist of professionals with expertise in
children, adolescent, and adult behavioral health including a representative of BHDDH and the
Department of Children, Youth and Families.
40.1-30-4. Oversight and reporting.
(a) BHDDH shall collect information from the operator(s) of the 988 call center and the
crisis outreach and stabilization services center(s), and shall submit an annual report to the governor
and the general assembly by February 1 of each year detailing:
(1) Revenue by category including, but not limited to, grants, and appropriations;
(2) Expenditures by category including, but not limited to, staffing, training, and
technology; and
(3) Service performance metrics including, but not limited to, call volume, wait times, and
abandonments.
(b) The Rhode Island auditor general shall conduct an annual audit of the 988 call center
and crisis outreach and stabilization services center(s) operations and funding and provide the
results to the governor, the speaker of the house; the president of the senate; the house of
representatives finance committee chair; and the senate finance committee chair.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
========
LC005059/SUB A
========
LC005059/SUB A - Page 3 of 4